Hawaii, session 2026, HB446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a hotel owned, operated, and managed by the State has the potential to offer numerous benefits for the people and economy of Hawaii. For instance, a state hotel could create workforce development opportunities for local residents and better allow the State to promote regenerative tourism for visitors. The legislature further finds that a state hotel could also support local students' career development through hospitality, regenerative tourism practices, sustainable development, and business management programs.  By providing local students valuable opportunities to gain professional experience in one of Hawaii's leading industries, there may be less of a need to search outside the State to recruit upper-level management and top leadership in the tourism industry. The legislature also finds that a state hotel could accommodate visitors and guests to university of Hawaii campuses, improve the recruitment of students to the university of Hawaii, and help generate additional revenue for the university of Hawaii system.  Moreover, there is also the potential for state hotels to eventually expand to more islands in the State. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to require the Hawaii tourism authority and school of travel industry management at the university of Hawaii at Manoa to collaborate to actively plan for the design, construction, and operations and management of a state hotel. SECTION 2.  (a)  The Hawaii tourism authority and school of travel industry management at the university of Hawaii at Manoa shall collaborate to actively plan for the design, construction, and operations and management of a state hotel. (b)  The state hotel shall be jointly managed by the Hawaii tourism authority and school of travel industry management at the university of Hawaii at Manoa. (c)  The state hotel may employ members of labor unions and students enrolled at the university of Hawaii. (d)  At least twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026, 2027, and 2028, the Hawaii tourism authority and school of travel industry management at the university of Hawaii at Manoa shall submit a report to the legislature regarding the progress of their plans for the design, construction, and operations and management of a state hotel. (e)  As used in this Act, "state hotel" means a hotel owned, operated, and managed by the State. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii tourism authority, in collaboration with the school of travel industry management at the university of Hawaii at Manoa, to actively plan for the design, construction, and operations and management of a state hotel, including but not limited to searching for a location and developing a design for the state hotel. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii tourism authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the school of travel industry management at the university of Hawaii at Manoa, in collaboration with the Hawaii tourism authority, to actively plan for the design, construction, and operations and management of a state hotel, including but not limited to searching for a location and developing a design for the state hotel. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________